Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1148.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 12, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 12-119.06, to read: START_STATUTE12-119.06. Attorney licenses; rules A. The supreme court shall license attorneys for the practice of law in this state and shall not delegate its duty to any other organization. The supreme court shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section, including: 1. Minimum qualifications for licensure. 2. Testing requirements. 3. Requiring a background investigation before obtaining a license. 4. Disciplining attorneys. 5. Disbarring attorneys. B. An attorney shall not be required to be a member of any nongovernmental organization to become or remain a licensed attorney in this state. END_STATUTE